Utah statutes.
70A-2a-501.   Default -- Procedure.
(1)  Whether the lessor or the lessee is in default under a lease contract is
determined by the lease agreement and this chapter.
(2)  If the lessor or the lessee is in default under the lease contract, the
party seeking enforcement has rights and remedies as provided in this chapter
and, except as limited by this chapter, as provided in the lease agreement.
(3)  If the lessor or the lessee is in default under the lease contract, the
party seeking enforcement may reduce the party's claim to judgment, or
otherwise enforce the lease contract by self-help or any available judicial
procedure or nonjudicial procedure, including administrative proceeding,
arbitration, or the like, in accordance with this chapter.
(4)  Except as otherwise provided in Subsection 70A-1a-305(1), in this
chapter, or in the lease agreement, the rights and remedies referred to in
Subsections (2) and (3) are cumulative.
(5)  If the lease agreement covers both real property and goods, the party
seeking enforcement may proceed under this section as to the goods, or under
other applicable law as to both the real property and the goods in accordance
with that person's rights and remedies in respect of the real property, in
which case this section does not apply.
